NepaliNLPWeb/WebContent/references/spellchecker_mpp/ne_NP.dic
अख्रि/8,17
अठोट्/1
अड्कल्/1
अड्कलि/8,17
अत्याइ/8,17
अरर्याइ/8,17
अर्जाप्/1
अराइ/8,17
अराल्/1
अल्प/8,17
आँक्/1
आत्ति/8,17
आफल्/1
आफू/7,16,18,22,15
इन्कारि/8,17
उ/3,16
उँग्/1
उक्कि/8,17
उकाल्/1
उकेर्/1
उकेर्याइ/8,17
उखाड्/1
उखेल्/1
उग्ल/8,17
उगेल्/1
उघ्रि/8,17
उचेर्/1
उछिट्टि/8,17
उजाड्/1
उजिल्याइ/8,17
उठ्/1
उड्काइ/8,17
उतार्/1
उद्र/8,17
उधार्/1
उधि/8,17
उन्/1
उपासि/8,17
उफार्/1
उब्र/8,17
उभड्/1
उभार्/1
उभारि/8,17
उम्/1
उम्कि/8,17
उम्रि/8,17
उमाल्/1
उमेठ्याइ/8,17
उराल्/1
उल्छ्याइ/8,17
उल्टि/8,17
ऐँच/8,17
ओइलाइ/8,17
ओकट्/1
ओगट्/1
ओझाइ/8,17
ओडाल्/1
ओथाइ/8,17
ओदार्/1
ओराल्/1
ओल्कि/8,17
ओल्स/8,17
औँटर्/1
औति/8,17
क/3
कच्याइ/8,17
कचोट्/1
कठिङ्‌ग्र्याइ/8,17
कथुर्याइ/8,17
कन्/1
कबुल्/1
कबुलाइ/8,17
कराइ/8,17
करेप्/1
कसि/8,17
काँप्/1
काढ्/1
काति/8,17
काम्/1
किट्/1
किटि/8,17
कुँड्/1
कुँडुलि/8,17
कुँद्/1
कुकुर्कि/8,17
कुट्कि/8,17
कुद्/1
कुदाइ/8,17
कुर्च्याइ/8,17
कुहि/8,17
केर्/1
कोचराइ/8,17
कोच्/1
कोचेल्/1
कोट्टि/8,17
कोपर्/1
कोप्च्याइ/8,17
कोर्/1
खँदारि/8,17
खकार्/1
खगार्/1
खटि/8,17
खतेर्/1
खनि/8,17
खप्/1
खपि/8,17
खर्कि/8,17
खस्/1
खस्रि/8,17
ख्याँच्/1
खा/8,17
खाप्/1
खार्/1
खारि/8,17
खिच्/1
खिपाइ/8,17
खिल्/1
खुँद्/1
खुट्टि/8,17
खुम्‌र्याइ/8,17
खुर्कि/8,17
खुल्/1
खुस्क/8,17
खेप्/1
खेरि/8,17
खेल्/1
खोक्‌र्याइ/8,17
खोक्/1
खोतर्/1
खोतरि/8,17
खोदल्/1
खोप्/1
खोपि/8,17
खोस्/1
खोस्ट्याइ/8,17
खोसेलि/8,17
गँज्याइ/8,17
गज्काइ/8,17
गढ्/1
गढि/8,17
गफल्क्याइ/8,17
गम्/1
गर्जाइ/8,17
गल्/1
गाँथि/8,17
गाँस्/1
गाभ्/1
गिँड्/1
गिजलि/8,17
गिजोल्/1
गुँडुल्कि/8,17
गुजार्/1
गुजारि/8,17
गुड्कि/8,17
गुथ्/1
गुनि/8,17
गुम्/1
गुर्काइ/8,17
गोद्/1
गोदि/8,17
घचेट्/1
घटि/8,17
घरघरि/8,17
घस्/1
घस्टाइ/8,17
घसेट्/1
घसेटाइ/8,17
घिच्/1
घिचि/8,17
घिसारि/8,17
घुक्/1
घुकि/8,17
घुम्/1
घुमि/8,17
घुस्/1
घुस्रि/8,17
घेर्/1
घोकि/8,17
घोच्/1
घोप्/1
घोप्टि/8,17
घोस्सि/8,17
ङ्याक्/1
चकार्/1
चटारि/8,17
चम्क/8,17
चर्/1
चर्चरि/8,17
चस्काइ/8,17
चहार्/1
च्याप्/1
च्याप्टि/8,17
चाट्/1
चाल्/1
चासि/8,17
चाहर्/1
चिच्याइ/8,17
चिढ्/1
चिथोर्/1
चिनि/8,17
चिमट्/1
चिम्ल्याइ/8,17
चिर्/1
चिरि/8,17
चुँड्/1
चुँडाइ/8,17
चुक्/1
चुक्याइ/8,17
चुठ्/1
चुठि/8,17
चुभुर्कि/8,17
चुम्/1
चुर्रि/8,17
चुहाइ/8,17
चेत्/1
चेप्रि/8,17
चोखि/8,17
चोथ्/1
चोप्/1
चोबलि/8,17
चोभ्/1
छँदाइ/8,17
छट्काइ/8,17
छन्क/8,17
छर्/1
छर्क/8,17
छल्याइ/8,17
छाँट्/1
छाँदि/8,17
छाड्/1
छान्/1
छाम्/1
छास्/1
छासि/8,17
छिँवल्/1
छिचलाइ/8,17
छिचोल्/1
छिटि/8,17
छिन्/1
छिप्/1
छिपि/8,17
छिरल्/1
छिल्/1
छिल्काइ/8,17
छु/8,17
छेक्/1
छेकाइ/8,17
छेद्/1
छेर्/1
छेराइ/8,17
छोप्/1
छोपि/8,17
छोस्/1
ज/3
जकाइ/8,17
जड्/1
जपाइ/8,17
जम्/1
जर्काइ/8,17
जाँच्/1
जाकि/8,17
जाग्/1
जित्/1
जिबुल्याइ/8,17
जिस्क्याइ/8,17
जुट्/1
जुटि/8,17
जुर्/1
जेलि/8,17
जोख्/1
जोत्/1
जोरि/8,17
झट्कार्/1
झट्काराइ/8,17
झन्क/8,17
झन्कार्/1
झप्काइ/8,17
झम्टि/8,17
झर्/1
झल्काइ/8,17
झाँक्/1
झाँटि/8,17
झान्/1
झिँजोल्/1
झिकि/8,17
झिजोल्/1
झुक्याइ/8,17
झुन्डि/8,17
झुम्/1
झुल्क/8,17
झेल्/1
झेलि/8,17
झोर्/1
झोसि/8,17
टक्राइ/8,17
टप्/1
टप्क/8,17
टरि/8,17
टल्/1
टस्कि/8,17
टाँक्/1
टाँस्/1
टाल्/1
टालि/8,17
टिप्/1
टिम्काइ/8,17
टुङ्ग्याइ/8,17
टेक्/1
टेकाइ/8,17
टोकस्/1
टोकाइ/8,17
टोपल्/1
ठङ्कार्/1
ठङ्कारि/8,17
ठम्याइ/8,17
ठस्सि/8,17
ठ्याँक्/1
ठाँट्/1
ठाडि/8,17
ठास्/1
ठिहिरि/8,17
ठेकाइ/8,17
ठेल्/1
ठोक्/1
ठोकाइ/8,17
डक्/1
डकाइ/8,17
डग्/1
डढ्/1
डढ्याइ/8,17
डाँक्/1
डाँकि/8,17
डाक्/1
डाम्/1
डामि/8,17
डुब्/1
डुलि/8,17
डोब्/1
डोरि/8,17
ढल्/1
ढल्काइ/8,17
ढाक्/1
ढाल्/1
ढुँडि/8,17
ढुक्/1
ढोग्/1
ढोगि/8,17
तँ/6,16
तक्/1
तङ्ग्र/8,17
तछार्/1
तड्पाइ/8,17
तप्क/8,17
तर्/1
तर्काइ/8,17
तराइ/8,17
ताक्/1
ताडि/8,17
तात्/1
ताप्/1
तिखार्/1
तिमी/7,16,18
तिराइ/8,17
तुन्/1
तुर्क/8,17
तुहु/8,17
तोक्/1
तोकि/8,17
तोप्/1
थकाइ/8,17
थचार्/1
थतर्क्याइ/8,17
थम्/1
थमाइ/8,17
थस्याइ/8,17
थाप्/1
थाल्/1
थिग्रि/8,17
थुँग्/1
थुत्/1
थुनाइ/8,17
थुपार्/1
थुरि/8,17
थेग्/1
थोपार्/1
दँद्याइ/8,17
दच्क/8,17
दप्कि/8,17
दपेट्/1
दर्क/8,17
दल्/1
दहर्याइ/8,17
दाग्/1
दाव्/1
दाह्रि/8,17
दुगुर्/1
दुगुराइ/8,17
दोक्चि/8,17
दोबार्/1
दौडि/8,17
धकेल्/1
धडाइ/8,17
धपेड्/1
धम्कि/8,17
धस्/1
धस्क/8,17
धान्/1
धानि/8,17
धिक्कार्/1
धुइराइ/8,17
धुरि/8,17
धोक्/1
धोत्रि/8,17
नङ्याइ/8,17
नाघ्/1
नाचि/8,17
नाथ्/1
नार्/1
निकाल्/1
निकालि/8,17
निखन्/1
निचर्/1
निचराइ/8,17
निछोट्/1
निथ्र/8,17
निप्ट्याइ/8,17
निफन्/1
निब्ट्याइ/8,17
निमठ्/1
निम्त्याइ/8,17
नियाल्/1
निल्/1
निस्क/8,17
निहुर/8,17
नेपर्/1
नेप्ट्याइ/8,17
पक्राइ/8,17
पखाल्/1
पग्ल/8,17
पगाल्/1
पच्/1
पच्छि/8,17
पछार्/1
पट्कार/8,17
पटार्/1
पड्क/8,17
पड्कार्/1
पतल्याइ/8,17
पतुर्/1
पन्छाइ/8,17
परगेल्/1
पर्गेल्/1
परि/8,17
पसाङ्गि/8,17
पसार्/1
पहिचान्/1
पाँद्/1
पाँदि/8,17
पाद्/1
पिँध्/1
पिटि/8,17
पिस्/1
पुगाइ/8,17
पुज्/1
पुस्टि/8,17
पेस्/1
पोति/8,17
पोल्/1
फच्याइ/8,17
फतल्/1
फपाइ/8,17
फ्याँक्/1
फाँकि/8,17
फाँद्/1
फिँज्/1
फिसोलाइ/8,17
फुँक्/1
फुटाल्/1
फुत्क/8,17
फुस्लि/8,17
फेर्/1
फोरि/8,17
बखान्/1
बच्चि/8,17
बज्/1
बढ्/1
बताइ/8,17
बन्/1
बर्कि/8,17
बल्/1
बल्झि/8,17
बाँच्/1
बाँचि/8,17
बार्/1
बिकाइ/8,17
बिगार्/1
बिटुलाइ/8,17
बित्/1
बियाँल्/1
बिर्साइ/8,17
बुगुल्टि/8,17
बुड्/1
बेक्ति/8,17
बेर्/1
बोकाइ/8,17
बोर्/1
भकुराइ/8,17
भटार्/1
भर्क/8,17
भाँच्/1
भाँडि/8,17
भास्/1
भिर्/1
भुकाइ/8,17
भुल्/1
भुसुल्ट्याइ/8,17
म/6,16
मड्क/8,17
मढ्/1
मन्त्र/8,17
मल्/1
मलि/8,17
माड्/1
मासाइ/8,17
मिच्/1
मुछाइ/8,17
मुड्/1
मुर्रि/8,17
मोड्/1
मोसाइ/8,17
य/3
रँगेल्/1
रगेडाइ/8,17
रङ्/1
रत्याइ/8,17
रम्/1
राँकि/8,17
रिँध्/1
रुँधि/8,17
रुङ्/1
रेट्/1
रेति/8,17
रोज्/1
लग्/1
लगारि/8,17
लछेर्/1
लट्टि/8,17
लपेटाइ/8,17
ललकार्/1
ललच्याइ/8,17
लिप्/1
लिप्ट्याइ/8,17
लुटि/8,17
लेप्/1
लेसाइ/8,17
लोपार्/1
लोभि/8,17
सँगालि/8,17
सँगेट्/1
सँभाल्/1
सग्ल्याइ/8,17
सज्/1
सड्क/8,17
सम्झाइ/8,17
समात्/1
समेटि/8,17
सराप्/1
सह्राइ/8,17
साँच्/1
साप्/1
सिँचि/8,17
सिउर्/1
सुँघ्/1
सुइँक/8,17
सुधारि/8,17
सुन्/1
सुर्काइ/8,17
सुसेल्/1
सोचि/8,17
हग्/1
हड्कि/8,17
हपार्/1
हर्कि/8,17
हाँप्/1
हाँसि/8,17
हामी/7,16,18
हाल्/1
हुँडलाइ/15,22,18,8
हुरेल्/1
हेपि/8,17
हेल्/1
